Massachusetts, session 194th, S460.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 15 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-   
Section 67. (a) At this time, a grant program has been established to increase robotics and 
STEM participation in public and charter schools. The program's purpose is to provide a 
platform for elementary and secondary students in public and charter schools to learn hard and 
soft skills, including public speaking, leadership, time and team management, problem-solving, 
creativity, hardware, and software, to enter the workforce. The program shall be known as the 
Workforce Preparation Robotics grant program and shall be funded by the department.   
(b) The department shall award program grants to public and charter elementary and 
secondary schools on the following basis:   

of 4 10  (i) Applicants shall be a public or charter elementary or secondary school in the state. 
Schools without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program shall be given 
preference for grant awards; provided, however, that schools located in the Cape Cod and 
Western Massachusetts school catchment area shall have priority for such grants;   
(ii) Applicants shall commit to running a team registered with one of the following 
organizations: FIRST Robotics Competition, FIRST Tech Challenge, FIRST Lego League 
Explore, FIRST Lego League Challenge, VEX Robotics Competition, VEX IQ Challenge or 
Science Olympiad; and   
(iii) Applications shall be submitted to the department by June first of each year for 
grants to be made for the following academic year.  
(c) The department shall grant awards to eligible schools in the following amount:  
(i) Elementary schools:   
(A) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $1,250 for a 
FIRST Lego League Challenge program and $590 for a FIRST Lego League Explore Team;   
(B) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $750 for a FIRST 
Lego League Challenge program and $370 for a FIRST Lego League Explore Team;   
(C) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $490 for a Science 
Olympiad Team   
(D) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $435 for a Science 
Olympiad Team   

of 4 30  (ii) middle schools:   
(A) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $4,000 for a 
FIRST Tech Challenge Team   
(B) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $3,000 for a FIRST 
Tech Challenge Team;   
(C) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $1,280 for a VEX 
IQ Challenge Team;   
(D) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $700 for a VEX IQ 
Challenge Team;   
(E) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $490 for a Science 
Olympiad Team   
(F) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $435 for a Science 
Olympiad Team   
(iii) high schools:   
(A) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $18,000 for a 
FIRST Robotics Competition Team;   
(B) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $15,000 for a FIRST 
Robotics Competition Team;   
(C) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $1,700 for a VEX 
Robotics Competition Team;   

of 4 50  (D) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $700 for a VEX 
Robotics Competition Team;    
(E) without a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $490 for a Science 
Olympiad Team   
(F) with a sponsored robotics club or established robotics program: $435 for a Science 
Olympiad Team   
(d) Program grant awards shall be within the amounts appropriated for the purpose and 
based on the availability of funds.   
(e) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this program.